Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1404
Employer; adjustment to wages authorized.

An employer may subtract from an employee's earned wages any time such employee, acting as a volunteer emergency responder, is away from his or her place of employment because of such employee's response to an emergency.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 7.